Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4424.
PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF MICHIGAN ENACT:
Sec. 678. (1) Except as otherwise provided under this section
and subject to the limitations under this section, for tax years
beginning on and after January 1, 2026 and before January 1, 2036,
a qualified taxpayer that complies with subsection (3) may claim a
credit against the tax imposed by this part in an amount equal to
$1.50 per gallon of sustainable aviation fuel that satisfies both
of the following:
(a) Is produced or blended in this state by the qualified
taxpayer.
KAS H00975'25 (H-2) n6yxbj


(b) Is sold in this state during the tax year by the qualified
taxpayer to a purchaser that certifies that the sustainable
aviation fuel was purchased for use as fuel in an aircraft
departing from an airport in this state.
(2) Subject to the limitation under this subsection, the
amount of the credit per gallon of sustainable aviation fuel
allowed under subsection (1) increases by $0.02 for each additional
1% reduction in life-cycle greenhouse gas emissions above 50%, as
determined in the same manner as provided under the sustainable
aviation fuel incentive program created under the sustainable
aviation fuel incentive program act. However, the maximum amount of
the credit per gallon of sustainable aviation fuel allowed under
this section must not exceed $2.00 per gallon.
(3) A taxpayer shall not claim a credit under this section
unless the department of environment, Great Lakes, and energy has
issued a tax credit certificate to the taxpayer. The qualified
taxpayer shall attach the tax credit certificate to the annual
return filed under this part on which a credit under this section
is claimed. A qualified taxpayer is not allowed to claim a credit
under this section in an amount greater than the maximum amount
stated on the tax credit certificate for the designated tax year.
(4) If the amount of the credit allowed under this section
exceeds the qualified taxpayer's tax liability for the tax year,
that portion that exceeds the tax liability for the tax year must
be refunded.
(5) As used in this section:
(a) "Aviation fuel", "greenhouse gas", "sustainable aviation
fuel", and "sustainable aviation fuel incentive program" mean those
terms as defined under section 3 of the sustainable aviation fuel
KAS H00975'25 (H-2) n6yxbj


incentive program act.
(b) "Qualified taxpayer" means a taxpayer that is engaged in
the business of producing or blending sustainable aviation fuel in
this state and that has been issued a tax credit certificate.
(c) "Tax credit certificate" means the certificate issued
under section 5 of the sustainable aviation fuel incentive program
act.
Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect
unless House Bill No. 4425 of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into
law.
Final Page
KAS H00975'25 (H-2) n6yxbj